test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Pron-Oct_2016_gt-norm.yaml
      eikeegi+Pron+Abe+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eikellegitagi
      eikeegi+Pron+Ess+Use/NotNorm: eikellegina
      eikeegi+Pron+Ess+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eikelleginagi
      eikeegi+Pron+Trm+Use/NotNorm: eikellegini
      eikeegi+Pron+Trm+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eikelleginigi
      eikeegi+Pron+Com+Use/NotNorm: eikellegiga
      eikeegi+Pron+Com+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eikellegigagi
      eikeegi+Pron+Tra+Use/NotNorm: eikellegiks
      eikeegi+Pron+Tra+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eikellegikski
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Abl: iseendalt
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: iseendaltki
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Ade: iseendal
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: iseendalgi
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+All: iseendale
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+All+Foc/gi: iseendalegi
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Ela: iseendast
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: iseendastki
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Ine: iseendas
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: iseendaski
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Abe: iseendata
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: iseendatagi
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Ess: iseendana
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: iseendanagi
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Trm: iseendani
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: iseendanigi
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Com: iseendaga
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: iseendagagi
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Gen: iseenda
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: iseendagi
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Tra: iseendaks
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: iseendakski
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Abl: iseeneselt
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: iseeneseltki
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Ade: iseenesel
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: iseeneselgi
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+All: iseenesele
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+All+Foc/gi: iseeneselegi
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Ela: iseenesest
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: iseenesestki
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Ine: iseeneses
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: iseeneseski
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Abe: iseeneseta
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: iseenesetagi
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Ess: iseenesena
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: iseenesenagi
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Trm: iseeneseni
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: iseenesenigi
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Com: iseenesega
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: iseenesegagi
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Gen: iseenese
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: iseenesegi
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Tra: iseeneseks
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: iseenesekski
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Ill: iseendasse
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: iseendassegi
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Ill: iseenesesse
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: iseenesessegi
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Par: iseend
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: iseendki
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Par: iseennast
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: iseennastki
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+Abl: iseendilt
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: iseendiltki
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+Ade: iseendil
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: iseendilgi
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+All: iseendile
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+All+Foc/gi: iseendilegi
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+Ela: iseendist
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: iseendistki
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+Ine: iseendis
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: iseendiski
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+Abe: iseendita
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: iseenditagi
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+Ess: iseendina
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: iseendinagi
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+Trm: iseendini
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: iseendinigi
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+Com: iseendiga
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: iseendigagi
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+Gen: iseendi
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: iseendigi
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+Tra: iseendiks
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: iseendikski
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+Abl: iseenestelt
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: iseenesteltki
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+Ade: iseenestel
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: iseenestelgi
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+All: iseenestele
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+All+Foc/gi: iseenestelegi
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+Ela: iseenestest
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: iseenestestki
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+Ine: iseenestes
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: iseenesteski
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+Abe: iseenesteta
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: iseenestetagi
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+Ess: iseenestena
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: iseenestenagi
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+Trm: iseenesteni
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: iseenestenigi
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+Com: iseenestega
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: iseenestegagi
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+Gen: iseeneste
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: iseenestegi
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+Tra: iseenesteks
      iseenese+Pron+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: iseenestekski
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Nom: iseise
      iseenese+Pron+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: iseisegi
      keegi+Pron+Sg+Par: keda
      keegi+Pron+Sg+Par: kedagi
      keegi+Pron+Sg+Nom: kee
      keegi+Pron+Sg+Nom: keegi
      keegi+Pron+Sg+Abl: kellelt
      keegi+Pron+Sg+Abl: kelleltki
      keegi+Pron+Sg+Ade: kellel
      keegi+Pron+Sg+Ade: kellelgi
      keegi+Pron+Sg+All: kellele
      keegi+Pron+Sg+All: kellelegi
      keegi+Pron+Sg+Ela: kellest
      keegi+Pron+Sg+Ela: kellestki
      keegi+Pron+Sg+Ine: kelles
      keegi+Pron+Sg+Ine: kelleski
      keegi+Pron+Sg+Ill: kellesse
      keegi+Pron+Sg+Ill: kellessegi
      keegi+Pron+Sg+Abe: kelleta
      keegi+Pron+Sg+Abe: kelletagi
      keegi+Pron+Sg+Ess: kellena
      keegi+Pron+Sg+Ess: kellenagi
      keegi+Pron+Sg+Trm: kelleni
      keegi+Pron+Sg+Trm: kellenigi
      keegi+Pron+Sg+Com: kellega
      keegi+Pron+Sg+Com: kellegagi
      keegi+Pron+Sg+Gen: kelle
      keegi+Pron+Sg+Gen: kellegi
      keegi+Pron+Sg+Tra: kelleks
      keegi+Pron+Sg+Tra: kellekski
      keegi+Pron+Abl+Use/NotNorm: kellegilt
      keegi+Pron+Abl+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: kellegiltki
      keegi+Pron+Ade+Use/NotNorm: kellegil
      keegi+Pron+Ade+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: kellegilgi
      keegi+Pron+All+Use/NotNorm: kellegile
      keegi+Pron+All+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: kellegilegi
      keegi+Pron+Ela+Use/NotNorm: kellegist
      keegi+Pron+Ela+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: kellegistki
      keegi+Pron+Ine+Use/NotNorm: kellegis
      keegi+Pron+Ine+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: kellegiski
      keegi+Pron+Ill+Use/NotNorm: kellegisse
      keegi+Pron+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: kellegissegi
      keegi+Pron+Abe+Use/NotNorm: kellegita
      keegi+Pron+Abe+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: kellegitagi
      keegi+Pron+Ess+Use/NotNorm: kellegina
      keegi+Pron+Ess+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: kelleginagi
      keegi+Pron+Trm+Use/NotNorm: kellegini
      keegi+Pron+Trm+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: kelleginigi
      keegi+Pron+Com+Use/NotNorm: kellegiga
      keegi+Pron+Com+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: kellegigagi
      keegi+Pron+Tra+Use/NotNorm: kellegiks
      keegi+Pron+Tra+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: kellegikski
      kes+Pron+Sg+Par: keda
      kes+Pron+Sg+Ade+Use/Rare: kel
      kes+Pron+Sg+Abl: kellelt
      kes+Pron+Sg+Ade: kellel
      kes+Pron+Sg+All: kellele
      kes+Pron+Sg+Ela: kellest
      kes+Pron+Sg+Ine: kelles
      kes+Pron+Sg+Ill: kellesse
      kes+Pron+Sg+Abe: kelleta
      kes+Pron+Sg+Ess: kellena
      kes+Pron+Sg+Trm: kelleni
      kes+Pron+Sg+Com: kellega
      kes+Pron+Sg+Gen: kelle
      kes+Pron+Sg+Tra: kelleks
      kes+Pron+Pl+Abl: kelledelt
      kes+Pron+Pl+Ade: kelledel
      kes+Pron+Pl+All: kelledele
      kes+Pron+Pl+Ela: kelledest
      kes+Pron+Pl+Ine: kelledes
      kes+Pron+Pl+Ill: kelledesse
      kes+Pron+Pl+Abe: kelledeta
      kes+Pron+Pl+Ess: kelledena
      kes+Pron+Pl+Trm: kelledeni
      kes+Pron+Pl+Com: kelledega
      kes+Pron+Pl+Gen: kellede
      kes+Pron+Pl+Tra: kelledeks
      kes+Pron+Sg+Nom: kes
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Nom: kumb
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Nom: kumbki
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ill: kumba
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ill: kumbagi
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Par: kumba
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Par: kumbagi
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Par: kumbasid
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Par: kumbasidki
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Abl: kumbadelt
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Abl: kumbadeltki
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Ade: kumbadel
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Ade: kumbadelgi
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+All: kumbadele
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+All: kumbadelegi
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Ela: kumbadest
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Ela: kumbadestki
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Ine: kumbades
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Ine: kumbadeski
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Ill: kumbadesse
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Ill: kumbadessegi
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Abe: kumbadeta
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Abe: kumbadetagi
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Ess: kumbadena
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Ess: kumbadenagi
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Trm: kumbadeni
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Trm: kumbadenigi
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Com: kumbadega
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Com: kumbadegagi
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Gen: kumbade
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Gen: kumbadegi
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Tra: kumbadeks
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Tra: kumbadekski
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: kumbi
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: kumbigi
      kumb+Pron+Sg+Nom: kumb
      kumb+Pron+Sg+Ill: kumba
      kumb+Pron+Sg+Par: kumba
      kumb+Pron+Pl+Par: kumbasid
      kumb+Pron+Pl+Abl: kumbadelt
      kumb+Pron+Pl+Ade: kumbadel
      kumb+Pron+Pl+All: kumbadele
      kumb+Pron+Pl+Ela: kumbadest
      kumb+Pron+Pl+Ine: kumbades
      kumb+Pron+Pl+Ill: kumbadesse
      kumb+Pron+Pl+Abe: kumbadeta
      kumb+Pron+Pl+Ess: kumbadena
      kumb+Pron+Pl+Trm: kumbadeni
      kumb+Pron+Pl+Com: kumbadega
      kumb+Pron+Pl+Gen: kumbade
      kumb+Pron+Pl+Tra: kumbadeks
      kumb+Pron+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: kumbi
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Abl: kummalt
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Abl: kummaltki
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ade: kummal
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ade: kummalgi
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+All: kummale
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+All: kummalegi
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ela: kummast
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ela: kummastki
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ine: kummas
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ine: kummaski
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ill+Use/Hyp: kummassegi
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ill+Use/Hyp: kummasse
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Abe: kummata
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Abe: kummatagi
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ess: kummana
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ess: kummanagi
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Trm: kummani
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Trm: kummanigi
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Com: kummaga
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Com: kummagagi
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Gen: kumma
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Gen: kummagi
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Tra: kummaks
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Tra: kummakski
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Nom: kummad
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Nom: kummadki
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Par+Use/NotNorm: kummageid
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Par+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: kummageidki
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Abl+Use/NotNorm: kummageilt
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: kummageiltki
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Ade+Use/NotNorm: kummageil
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: kummageilgi
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+All+Use/NotNorm: kummageile
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: kummageilegi
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Ela+Use/NotNorm: kummageist
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: kummageistki
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Ine+Use/NotNorm: kummageis
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: kummageiski
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Ill+Use/NotNorm: kummageisse
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: kummageissegi
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Tra+Use/NotNorm: kummageiks
      kumbki+Pron+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: kummageikski
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Abl+Use/NotNorm: kummagilt
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: kummagiltki
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ade+Use/NotNorm: kummagil
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: kummagilgi
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+All+Use/NotNorm: kummagile
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+All+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: kummagilegi
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ela+Use/NotNorm: kummagist
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: kummagistki
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ine+Use/NotNorm: kummagis
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: kummagiski
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ill+Use/NotNorm: kummagisse
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: kummagissegi
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Abe+Use/NotNorm: kummagita
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: kummagitagi
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ess+Use/NotNorm: kummagina
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: kummaginagi
      kumbki+Pron+Sg+Trm+Use/NotNorm: kummagini
